Hawaii statutes.
§607-21 Expense of bond. Any receiver,
assignee, guardian, trustee, committee, personal representative, commissioner,
or other fiduciary required by law or the order of any court to give a bond, or
other obligation as such, may include as a part of the lawful and chargeable
expense of executing the individual's trust a reasonable sum, to be paid to a
company authorized under the laws of the State to become surety on the bond or
obligation for becoming the individual's surety thereon, as may be allowed by
the court in which the individual is required to account, not exceeding one per
cent a year on the amount of the bond. [RL 1935, pt of §3793; RL 1945, §9759;
RL 1955, §219-20; HRS §607-21; am L 1972, c 88, §5(u); am L 1976, c 200, pt of
§1; am L 2016, c 55, §23]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next